Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB118.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 2.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The first day of January (New Year's Day), the third Monday of January (Birthday
of Martin Luther King, Jr.), the nineteenth day of January (Robert E. Lee Day), the
thirtieth day of January (Franklin D. Roosevelt Day), the twelfth day of February
(Lincoln's Birthday), the third Monday in February (Washington's Birthday), the
last Monday in May (Memorial Day), the third day of June (Confederate Memorial
Day, and Jefferson Davis Day), the nineteenth day of June (Juneteenth National
Freedom Day), the fourth day of July (Independence Day), the first Monday in
September (Labor Day), the second Monday in October (Columbus Day), the
eleventh day of November (Veterans Day), the twenty-fifth day of December
(Christmas Day) of each year, and all days appointed by the President of the United
States or by the Governor as days of thanksgiving, are holidays, on which all the
public offices of this Commonwealth may be closed.
(2) No person shall be compelled to labor on the first Monday in September (Labor
Day) by any person.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 7/10/2025 12:17 PM Jacketed